Maryland, session 2026, SB0311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–212.
(a) The target per pupil foundation amount includes costs associated with
implementing the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future including:
(1) Increasing salaries;
(2) Additional teachers to provide professional learning and collaborative
time for teachers;
(3) Career counseling;
(4) Behavioral health;
(5) Instructional opportunities for students who are college and career
ready and those who are not;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
(6) Maintenance and operation of schools;
(7) Supplies and materials for teachers; and
(8) Educational technology including digital devices, broadband
connectivity, and information technology staff.
(b) Schools may use funds provided under this section to provide the programs
required under COMAR 13A.04.16.01.
(c) (1) County boards of education and schools shall prioritize the purchase of
digital devices for using funds under subsection (a)(8) of this section.
(2) Additional funds provided in the target per pupil foundation amount for
educational technology are intended to supplement and not supplant existing funding
provided for educational technology.
[(3) (i) On or before November 15 each year, each county board shall
submit a report to the Department detailing, for the previous fiscal year:
1. The amount spent by the local school system on technology
disaggregated by digital devices, connectivity, and information technology staff; and
2. The percentage of students, teachers, and staff with
digital devices and adequate connectivity in their homes in accordance with the Federal
Communications Commission standards for broadband.
(ii) On or before December 15 each year, the Department shall
submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, a compilation of the reports submitted to the Department under subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph.
(iii) On or before September 1, 2021, the Department shall establish
uniform reporting requirements, including definitions to ensure that consistent and
comparable reports are submitted under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.]
5–222.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Compensatory education enrollment” means:
1. Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph,
for fiscal years 2017 through [2026] 2027 2028, the greater of:
– 3 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. The number of students eligible for free or reduced price
meals for the prior fiscal year;
B. For county boards that participate, in whole or in part, in
the United States Department of Agriculture community eligibility provision, the number
of students equal to the greater of:
I. The sum of the number of students in participating schools
identified by direct certification for the prior fiscal year, plus the number of students
identified by the income information provided by the family to the school system on an
alternative form developed by the Department for the prior fiscal year, plus the number of
students eligible for free and reduced price meals from any schools not participating in the
community eligibility provision for the prior fiscal year; or
II. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the number of
students eligible for free and reduced price meals at schools not participating in the
community eligibility provision for the prior fiscal year, plus the product of the percentage
of students eligible for free and reduced price meals at participating schools for the fiscal
year prior to opting into the community eligibility provision multiplied by the prior fiscal
year enrollment; or
C. The number of students directly certified and who are
enrolled in a public school in the county in the prior fiscal year; and
2. For fiscal year [2027] 2028 2029 and each fiscal year
thereafter, the greater of:
A. The number of students eligible for free or reduced price
meals using the United States Department of Agriculture count or the alternative State
form for the prior fiscal year; or
B. The number of direct certification students who are
enrolled in a public school in the county in the prior fiscal year.
(ii) For the purpose of the calculation under subparagraph (i)1BII of
this paragraph, the schools participating in the community eligibility provision during the
pilot year may use the percentage of students identified for free and reduced price meals
during the pilot year.
(iii) For the purpose of the calculation under subparagraph (i)1 of this
paragraph, direct certification multiplied by the multiplier may be used only for schools
that did not exist prior to the year the school system opted into the United States
Department of Agriculture community eligibility provision.
5–223.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
(b) (1) There is a Concentration of Poverty School Grant Program in the State.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to eligible schools with
a high concentration of eligible students.
(3) The Program consists of the:
(i) Personnel grant; and
(ii) Per pupil grant.
(c) (4) If the personnel grant provided to an eligible school exceeds the cost to
employ the positions and provide the coverage required under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the eligible school may only use the excess funds to:
(i) Provide wraparound services to the students enrolled in the
eligible school;
(ii) Complete the needs assessment; and
(iii) In fiscal years 2021 through 2025, provide the requirements
under COMAR Title 13A, Subtitle 04, including 13A.04.16.01.
(9) The personnel and per pupil grant may be used [through fiscal year
2027] to provide the programs required under COMAR Title 13A, Subtitle 04, including
13A.04.16.01.
6–126.
(a) (1) This subsection applies to individuals who have graduated from a
teacher preparation program or an alternative teacher preparation program.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2025, to qualify for an initial certificate an
individual shall:
(i) Pass the subject–specific examinations under § 6–125 of this
subtitle;
(ii) Meet one of the following qualifications:
1. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, pass:
A. A nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment of
teaching ability; or
– 5 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. A portfolio–based assessment of a [nationally accredited]
teacher preparation program THAT HAS NATIONAL ACCREDITATION OR HAS BEEN
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT; or
2. Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, complete a
rigorous local school system teacher induction program that lasts for the lesser of:
A. 3 years; or
B. The amount of time a teacher may hold a conditional
teacher certificate;
(iii) Meet one of the following qualifications:
1. Pass a basic literacy skills assessment approved by the
Department under § 6–125 of this subtitle;
2. Hold a degree from a regionally accredited educational
institution and have earned a minimum overall cumulative grade point average of 3.0 on a
4.0 scale or its equivalent on the most recently earned degree; or
3. Submit documentation to the Department of having
received effective evaluations from a local school system for 3 years;
(iv) Pass a rigorous State–specific examination of mastery of reading
instruction and content for the grade level the individual will be teaching; and
(v) Satisfactorily complete any other requirements established by
the State Board.
(3) (I) An individual who graduates from a teacher preparation
program in the State who passed a nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION may not be required to take
the assessment more than one time.
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES A
DEPARTMENT–SPONSORED REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM FOR
TEACHING MAY SUBMIT THE APPRENTICESHIP CERTIFICATE IN LIEU OF PASSAGE OF
AN ASSESSMENT OF TEACHING ABILITY UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II)1A (2)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(4) (i) In order to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2)(ii)2 of this
subsection, a candidate for an initial teacher certificate shall submit documentation to the
Department that the candidate has completed a rigorous comprehensive induction
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
program, established in accordance with § 6–117 of this subtitle, that meets the
requirements of this paragraph.
(ii) The comprehensive induction program shall be developed by a
local school system, either independently or collaboratively with other local school systems.
(iii) Before establishing a comprehensive induction program, one or
more local school systems shall submit a plan for the program to the Department and the
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(iv) The comprehensive induction program shall include a locally
developed portfolio component that is aligned with the Interstate Teacher Assessment and
Support Consortium Standards.
(v) A teacher preparation program or an alternative teacher
preparation program may use the locally developed portfolio component under
subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph as meeting a portion of the coursework requirements
of the program.
(vi) A candidate who satisfactorily completes a comprehensive
induction program established in accordance with this paragraph may not be required to
pass a nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment of teaching ability.
(b) In addition to any other requirements established by the State Board, to
qualify for a certificate in the State, a teacher who graduated from an institution of higher
education A TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAM in another state or holds a professional
license or certificate from another state shall:
(1) Pass an examination of teaching ability within 18 months of being hired
by a local school system;
(2) Hold an active National Board Certification from the National Board
for Professional Teaching Standards; [or]
(3) Complete a comprehensive induction program in accordance with
subsection (a)(4) of this section; OR
(4) SUBMIT DOCUMENTATION TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HAVING
RECEIVED EFFECTIVE EVALUATIONS FROM A SCHOOL OR SCHOOL SYSTEM FOR 2
YEARS.
(c) (1) The Department, after a reasonable period of review and assessment,
shall determine whether one of the assessments of teaching skill approved for initial
teacher certification under this section more adequately measures the skills and knowledge
required of a highly qualified teacher.
– 7 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) If the Department makes a determination under paragraph (1) of this
subsection that requires a revision to the statutory requirements for initial teacher
certification, the Department shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, submit a report to the General Assembly on or before the next September 1 on its
recommendations for revising the qualifications for initial teacher certification.
(d) (1) The Department shall actively monitor and assess, during their
implementation and development, new teacher standards and assessments produced under
this section for any negative impact on the diversity of teacher candidates passing the
initial teacher certification assessments.
(2) The Department shall report the results of its monitoring and
assessment to the Accountability and Implementation Board established under § 5–402 of
this article.
6–1006.
(a) (1) There is an administrator track on level four of the career ladder.
(b) (1) The first tier of the administrator track is a licensed principal.
(2) (i) The State Board, in consultation with the Professional Standards
and Teacher Education Board, shall establish the criteria that a teacher shall meet to
achieve the licensed principal tier.
(ii) The criteria under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph
and beginning on July 1, [2029] 2034, shall include a requirement that a teacher be an
NBC teacher before the teacher may be a licensed principal; and
2. May include a requirement that a teacher shall complete
an induction or training program for new principals.
(iii) The State Board, in consultation with the Professional Standards
and Teacher Education Board, shall establish a process through which an individual may
receive a waiver to serve as a licensed principal if the individual:
1. Is not an NBC teacher; but
2. Meets other qualifying criteria, as determined by the State
Board, in consultation with the Professional Standards and Education Board.
7–205.1.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, beginning in the 2023–2024
school year, each county board shall provide all students who meet the CCR standard
required under subsection (c) of this section with access to the following post college and
career readiness (post–CCR) pathways, at no cost to the student or the student’s parents,
including the cost of any fees:
(i) A competitive entry college preparatory program, chosen by the
county board, consisting of:
1. The International Baccalaureate Diploma Program;
2. The Cambridge AICE Diploma Program; or
3. A comparable program consisting of Advanced Placement
courses specified by the College Board;
(ii) A program that allows a student, through an early college
program or dual enrollment at a student’s high school and an institution of higher
education to earn:
1. An associate degree; or
2. At least 60 credits toward a bachelor’s degree; and
(iii) A robust set of career and technology education programs that
are [recommended by the CTE Skills Standards Advisory Committee and approved]
ADOPTED by the CTE Committee and that allow students to complete:
1. A credit or noncredit certificate or license program, course,
or sequence of courses, including a program, course, or courses taken through dual
enrollment under § 15–127 of this article, at a secondary or postsecondary institution,
through an Advanced Placement course at a secondary institution, or through an
apprenticeship sponsor that leads to an industry recognized occupational–credential or
postsecondary certificate;
2. A registered apprenticeship program approved by the
Division of Workforce Development and Adult Learning within the Maryland Department
of Labor; or
3. A youth apprenticeship program, under Title 18, Subtitle
18 of this article.
(4) To phase in expansion of dual enrollment to maximize the number of
students who can earn the maximum number of dual enrollment credits consistent with
the phased increases in school funding, for fiscal years 2025 through [2027] 2030, the State
Board and the Accountability and Implementation Board, in consultation with each local
– 9 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
school system, may limit the number and types of courses that a student dually enrolled at
the student’s public high school and at an institution of higher education may enroll in
during the school year at the institution of higher education as part of the post–CCR
pathway in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection and § 15–127 of this article.
9.9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Wraparound services” means:
(1) Extended learning time, including before and after school, weekends,
summer school, and an extended school year;
(2) Safe transportation to and from school and off–site learning
opportunities, including apprenticeship programs;
(3) Vision, hearing, and dental care services;
(4) Establishing or expanding school–based health center services;
(5) Additional social workers, mentors, counselors, therapists,
psychologists, and restorative practice coaches;
(6) Enhancing physical wellness, including providing healthy food for
in–school and out–of–school time and linkages to community providers;
(7) Enhancing behavioral health services, including access to mental
health practitioners and providing professional development to school staff to provide
trauma–informed interventions;
(8) Providing family and community engagement and supports, including
informing parents of academic course offerings, language classes, workforce development
training, opportunities for children, and available social services as well as educating
families on how to monitor a child’s learning;
(9) Establishing and enhancing linkages to Judy Centers and other early
education programs that feed into the school;
(10) Enhancing student enrichment experiences, including educational field
trips, partnerships, and programs with museums, arts organizations, and cultural
institutions;
(11) Offering evidence–based in–school and in–person tutoring, AND
OTHER EVIDENCE–BASED ACADEMIC INTERVENTIONS TO IMPROVE STUDENT
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
OUTCOMES FOCUSED ON INDIVIDUAL AND SMALL GROUP INSTRUCTION, provided
during the school day, AND OTHER EVIDENCE–BASED ACADEMIC INTERVENTIONS;
(12) Improving student attendance and chronic absenteeism;
(13) Improving the learning environment at the school; and
(14) Any professional development for teachers and school staff to quickly
identify students who are in need of these resources.
21–209.
(a) There is a Career and Technical Education (CTE) Committee.
(b) (1) The CTE Committee is a unit within the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(2) The CTE Committee shall operate under the oversight of the
Accountability and Implementation Board, established under Title 5, Subtitle 4 of this
article.
(c) (1) The purpose of the CTE Committee is to [build] DIRECT AND
COORDINATE THE DEVELOPMENT OF an integrated, globally competitive [framework]
AND ALIGNED SYSTEM for providing CTE to Maryland students in public schools,
institutions of postsecondary education, and the workforce.
(2) The CTE Committee shall strive to integrate CTE in secondary and
postsecondary institutions in the State.
(3) The CTE Committee shall consist of individuals who collectively reflect,
to the extent practicable, the INDUSTRIAL, geographical, racial, ethnic, cultural, and
gender diversity of the State.
(d) The CTE Committee is composed of the following members of the Governor’s
Workforce Development Board:
(1) The State Superintendent;
(2) The Secretary of Higher Education;
(3) The Secretary of Labor;
(4) The Secretary of Commerce; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) [The chair of the Skills Standards Advisory Committee, established
under § 21–208 of this subtitle; and
(6) The following six] SEVEN members, jointly selected by the Governor,
the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Delegates, who collectively
represent:
(i) Employers;
(ii) Industry or trade associations;
(iii) Labor organizations;
(iv) Community colleges;
(v) The agricultural community; and
(vi) Experts in CTE programming.
(e) The Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Delegates jointly shall appoint a chair of the CTE Committee from among the [committee’s
members] COMMITTEE MEMBERS WHO ARE EMPLOYER REPRESENTATIVES.
(f) A member of the CTE Committee:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the CTE Committee; and
(2) Is not entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations for duties performed under this section.
(g) The CTE Committee may employ additional staff necessary to carry out the
committee’s functions as provided in the State budget.
(h) The CTE Committee shall perform the following duties:
(1) Develop a statewide framework for CTE that prepares students for
employment in a diverse, modern economy;
(2) Allocate roles and responsibilities to State agencies for the
credentialing of students, INCLUDING THOSE engaged in CTE programs;
(3) Adopt and, where appropriate, develop and regularly update, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE, a comprehensive and cohesive system
of [occupational skills] CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION, INCLUDING NECESSARY
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, COMPETENCIES, AND CREDENTIALING standards to drive the
State’s WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND CTE [system] SYSTEMS;
(4) Work with the business community, including nonprofit entities and
apprenticeship sponsors, to develop CTE learning opportunities;
(5) Bring together representatives from public schools, institutions of
postsecondary education, and the business community, including nonprofit entities and
apprenticeship sponsors, to ensure that CTE programs are aligned with the State’s
economic development and workforce goals and operate with best global practices;
(6) Set content qualification and recruitment standards for CTE
instructors;
(7) Determine which programs should be approved for credit towards high
school graduation requirements;
(8) [Approve, reject, or modify the proposals made by the CTE Skills
Standards Advisory Committee established under § 21–208 of this subtitle to establish CTE
programs for public school students;
(9)] Address operational issues associated with delivering CTE programs to
students, including transportation to and from job sites;
[(10)] (9) Review agency budget proposals involving CTE and make
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on or before December 15 each year;
[(11)] (10) Monitor the progress of CTE in the State, including progress on
implementing the CTE goals in the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future;
[(12)] (11) Develop yearly goals for each county board to reach the statewide
goal under § 21–204 of this subtitle that 45% of public HIGH school students [achieve an]
COMPLETE THE HIGH SCHOOL LEVEL OF A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP OR
ANOTHER industry–recognized [occupational] credential before they graduate;
[(13)] (12) Track progress toward and perform any tasks necessary to
achieve the statewide goal under § 21–204 of this subtitle that 45% of public high school
students [achieve a youth apprenticeship or any other] COMPLETE THE HIGH SCHOOL
LEVEL OF A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP OR ANOTHER industry–recognized
[occupational] credential, AS DEFINED BY THE CTE COMMITTEE, before they graduate;
[(14)] (13) Establish, administer, and supervise the CTE Expert Review
Teams established under § 5–412 of this article;
– 13 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(15)] (14) Using State accountability data, identify schools to be
[investigated] REVIEWED by CTE Expert Review Teams in which sufficient numbers of
students or groups of demographically distinct students are not making adequate progress
towards the completion of the CTE pathway;
[(16)] (15) Submit to the Accountability and Implementation Board plans
for deploying CTE Expert Review Teams, and deploy the teams in accordance with
approved plans;
[(17)] (16) Share information on CTE education with the Accountability and
Implementation Board; [and]
(17) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS AND PROVIDE GUIDANCE ON SETTING
THE OCCUPATIONAL STANDARDS NECESSARY FOR A STRONG CTE SYSTEM THAT
SHALL FORM THE BASIS FOR THE POST–CCR CTE PATHWAY REQUIRED UNDER §
7–205.1(G)(3) OF THIS ARTICLE;
(18) IN COLLABORATION WITH AND SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF
THE GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD AND IN CONSULTATION
WITH OTHER INDUSTRY REPRESENTATIVES, DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF
HIGH–SKILL, HIGH–WAGE, OR IN–DEMAND PRIORITY OCCUPATIONS FOR THE STATE;
(19) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–211 OF THIS SUBTITLE, MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS TO STATE AGENCIES AND OFFICES, INCLUDING TO THE
DEPARTMENT, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, THE MARYLAND HIGHER
EDUCATION COMMISSION, AND THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION
BOARD, ON ADJUSTMENTS TO THE STATE’S CTE SYSTEM TO ENSURE THE SYSTEM:
(I) REMAINS GLOBALLY COMPETITIVE;
(II) IS ADMINISTERED ACCORDING TO BEST GLOBAL
PRACTICES; AND
(III) WHEN INFORMING THE DESIGN OF COURSES AND
PROGRAMS OF STUDY, LEVERAGES THE CAREER PATHWAY AND OCCUPATIONAL
STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER § 21–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
[(18)] (20) Perform any other duties assigned by the Governor’s Workforce
Development Board.
(i) The CTE Committee may:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
(1) Make grants to innovative programs developed by public schools,
institutions of postsecondary education, apprenticeship sponsors, nonprofits, and other
persons that help further the CTE Committee’s purpose;
(2) Contract with a public or private entity to research and analyze the
provision of CTE to students;
(3) Create advisory structures necessary to ensure essential input from
educators, parents, unions, employers, apprenticeship sponsors, community organizers,
local workforce boards, and other key stakeholders; and
(4) Adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the committee’s duties and
administer CTE in the State.
(j) (1) A majority of CTE Committee members constitutes a quorum.
(2) Action by the CTE Committee requires the affirmative vote of a
majority of the committee members present.
(k) (1) Each year, the CTE Committee shall report to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly, and the
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(2) The CTE Committee’s report shall include:
(i) An annual assessment of the state of CTE within the State; and
(ii) Statutory, regulatory, budgetary, and structural changes needed
to address the challenges of the evolving CTE system.
(3) Any student–level information in the CTE Committee’s report shall be
disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, family income level, linguistic status, and
disability status.
[21–210.
(a) In this section, “Advisory Committee” means the CTE Skills Standards
Advisory Committee.
(b) The CTE Committee shall create a CTE Skills Standards Advisory
Committee.
(c) (1) The purpose of the Advisory Committee is to make recommendations
and provide advice to the CTE Committee on setting the occupational standards necessary
for a strong CTE system.
– 15 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The recommendations made by the Advisory Committee shall form the
basis for the post–CCR CTE pathway required under § 7–205.1 of this article.
(d) (1) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of members appointed by
the chair of the CTE Committee that include employers, unions, apprenticeship sponsors,
and other experts on occupational skills, including agricultural skills.
(2) To the extent practicable, the Advisory Committee shall be composed of
members of the Governor’s Workforce Development Board who do not serve on the CTE
Committee.
(e) A member of the Advisory Committee:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the Advisory Committee;
and
(2) Is not entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations for duties performed under this section.
(f) (1) The Advisory Committee shall make recommendations to the CTE
Committee concerning:
(i) A comprehensive array of career advancement guidelines,
including standards for each occupation in a profession and concrete steps and
accomplishments needed to progress to a greater skilled occupation in a given field;
(ii) Credentials to be issued at each stage of advancement and
criteria necessary to be awarded a particular credential; and
(iii) Necessary adjustments to ensure that the State’s CTE system
remains globally competitive and administered according to best global practices.
(2) In making recommendations under this subsection, the Advisory
Committee shall strive to create a comprehensive, unified system of career progression
that:
(i) Is attuned to the State’s workforce needs;
(ii) Features integration among as many industries as possible;
(iii) Features performance assessments administered by industry
practitioners whenever possible;
(iv) Allows a student trained in one career to seamlessly transfer the
student’s skills and education to a new career in a different field;
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
(v) Seeks to incorporate as much education in a job setting as is
practicable;
(vi) Incorporates professional workplace soft skills, including
interpersonal and communication skills, time management, business etiquette, and use of
common business tools; and
(vii) Incorporates education in high school, community college, and
other postsecondary occupation programs into a seamless whole that will provide students
with credentials at various points that build on previous credentials.
(g) The terms, meeting times, procedures, and policies guiding removal of
members for the Advisory Committee shall be determined by the CTE Committee.]
21–210.
(A) (1) FOR EACH OCCUPATION ON THE LIST DEVELOPED UNDER §
21–209(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE CTE COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP, IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD,
COMPREHENSIVE, PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION.
(2) THE CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION SHALL INCLUDE
INFORMATION ON:
(I) SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE, COMPETENCIES, EXPERIENCE, OR
CREDENTIAL STANDARDS FOR EACH OCCUPATION;
(II) CONCRETE STEPS TO OBTAIN THE SKILLS, COMPETENCIES,
EXPERIENCES, OR CREDENTIALS NECESSARY TO ADVANCE ON A CAREER PATHWAY
OR TO HIGHER–PAYING ROLES IN A PROFESSION;
(III) CREDENTIALS TO BE ISSUED AT EACH STAGE OF CAREER
PATHWAY ADVANCEMENT; AND
(IV) NECESSARY CRITERIA TO BE AWARDED A CREDENTIAL.
(3) THE CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION SHALL BE ADOPTED BY THE
GOVERNOR’S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD.
(B) ALL STATE AGENCIES AND RELEVANT WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
EDUCATION PROGRAMS SHALL USE THE LIST OF OCCUPATIONS DEVELOPED UNDER
§ 21–209(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE AND CAREER PATHWAY INFORMATION DEVELOPED
UNDER THIS SECTION AS A GUIDELINE FOR CURRICULUM ALIGNMENT,
CREDENTIALING, AND CAREER ADVANCEMENT.
– 17 –

Ch. 602 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
21–211.
IN MAKING THE RECOMMENDATIONS REQUIRED UNDER § 21–209(H) OF THIS
SUBTITLE REGARDING ADJUSTMENTS TO THE STATE’S CTE SYSTEM, THE CTE
COMMITTEE SHALL STRIVE TO CREATE A COMPREHENSIVE, UNIFIED SYSTEM OF
CAREER PROGRESSION THAT:
(1) IS ATTUNED TO THE STATE’S WORKFORCE NEEDS;
(2) FEATURES INTEGRATION AMONG AS MANY INDUSTRIES AS
POSSIBLE;
(3) FEATURES PERFORMANCE ASSESSMENTS ADMINISTERED BY
INDUSTRY PRACTITIONERS WHENEVER POSSIBLE;
(4) ALLOWS A STUDENT TRAINED IN ONE CAREER TO SEAMLESSLY
TRANSFER THE STUDENT’S SKILLS AND EDUCATION TO A NEW CAREER IN A
DIFFERENT FIELD;
(5) INCORPORATES PROFESSIONAL WORKPLACE SOFT SKILLS,
INCLUDING INTERPERSONAL AND COMMUNICATION SKILLS, TIME MANAGEMENT,
BUSINESS ETIQUETTE, AND USE OF COMMON BUSINESS TOOLS; AND
(6) INCORPORATES EDUCATION IN HIGH SCHOOL, COMMUNITY
COLLEGE, AND OTHER POSTSECONDARY OCCUPATIONAL TRAINING PROGRAMS
INTO A UNIFIED SYSTEM THAT WILL PROVIDE STUDENTS WITH CREDENTIALS AT
VARIOUS POINTS THAT BUILD ON PREVIOUS CREDENTIALS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 5–206 and 5–411 § 5–411 of the
Education Article:
(1), the State Department of Education shall suspend operation of the
Expert Review Team Program during the 2026–2027 school year; and
(2) the funding allocated for the Expert Review Team Program in the fiscal
year 2027 operating budget shall be transferred to the Academic Excellence Fund
established under § 6–1105 of the Education Article.
(b) Notwithstanding any limitations in Chapter 4 of the Acts of 2026, in the fiscal
year 2027 operating budget:
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 602
(1) $3,334,574 of the appropriation for the Expert Review Team Program
under Aid to Education (R00A02) may be used for the Judith P. Hoyer Early Childhood
Education Enhancement Program established under § 5–230 of the Education Article; and
(2) $3,334,574 of the fiscal year 2027 General Fund appropriation for the
Judith P. Hoyer Early Childhood Education Enhancement Program under Aid to Education
(R00A02) may be transferred to the Academic Excellence Fund established under § 6–1105
of the Education Article.
(b) (c) On or before November 1, 2026, the State Department of Education and the
Accountability and Implementation Board jointly shall submit a report to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee, the
House Appropriations Committee, and the House Ways and Means Committee on plans for
future implementation of the Expert Review Team Program under § 5–411 of the Education
Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Accountability and Implementation Board and State Department of
Education shall identify a methodology for counting students from low–income households
to calculate the Compensatory Education formula under § 5–222 of the Education Article.
(b) The Accountability and Implementation Board and the State Department of
Education shall engage in a collaborative and transparent process for identifying the
method for counting students from low–income households under subsection (a) of this
section, including consultation with the Department of Budget and Management and the
Department of Legislative Services.
(c) On or before December 31, 2026, the The Accountability and Implementation
Board and the State Department of Education jointly shall submit a report the following
reports on their findings and recommendations regarding the methodology for counting
students from low–income households under this section to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly:
(1) on or before December 31, 2026, an interim report; and
(2) on or before September 30, 2027, a final report.
SECTION 2. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 19 –